Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-407
Emery wheels and grindstones; hoods or hoppers required.

Every emery wheel and grindstone shall be fitted with a sheet or cast iron hood or hopper, of such form so adjusted that the dust or refuse therefrom will fall or be thrown into such hood or hopper by centrifugal force, and be carried off by the current of air into a suction pipe.

Laws 1911, c. 67, § 7, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 3594;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 7, p. 560;

C.S.1922, § 7688;

C.S.1929, § 48-407;

R.S.1943, § 48-407.

Applicability of act is limited to those operating factory or workshop. Quist v. Duda, 159 Neb. 393, 67 N.W.2d 481 (1954).